Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1856.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 20m-1 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
10-8 Fund".
B. There is hereby established the "Oklahoma 10-8 Fund Grant
Program".
C. As used in this act:
Req. No. 11398 Page 1

1. "In-service" means completion of Council on Law Enforcement
Educational Training (CLEET) certification, completed all training
expected of a newly hired peace officer of their agency, including
field training, and being assigned a workload commensurate with
fulfilling the duties of a fully trained peace officer; and
2. "Peace officer" means a sworn police officer, sheriff's
deputy, or highway patrol trooper.
D. The Office of the Attorney General shall establish and
administer the Oklahoma 10-8 Fund Grant Program to support the
state's purpose of ensuring professional law enforcement throughout
the state by providing financial assistance to peace officers. Such
program shall embody the following procedures and criteria:
1. Not later than the thirtieth day after the first day of each
year, the peace officer may submit an application for a grant to the
Office of the Attorney General. A peace officer may submit only one
application each year;
2. New peace officers may apply for funds when the following
criteria has been met:
a. the peace officer was hired after the effective date
of this act,
b. the peace officer is CLEET-certified,
c. the peace officer has been in-service within their
current jurisdiction for at least six (6) months, and

Req. No. 11398 Page 2

d. the peace officer is either serving as a peace officer
in the State of Oklahoma for the first time or is
serving as a peace officer in the State of Oklahoma
for the first time since January 1, 2020; and
3. Grants awarded under the provisions of this section shall be
given to peace officers that meet the criteria in paragraph 2 of
this subsection in the following amounts, or in proportionally
equivalent reduced amounts if available funding for the program is
limited.
Upon verification by CLEET that the peace officer meets the
stipulations of the program, the peace officer is entitled to a one-
time bonus of either:
a. Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) if at the time of
hiring the officer, the agency by which they are
employed had fifty or more budgeted vacancies of sworn
peace officer positions, or
b. Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) if at the time of
hiring the officer, the agency by which they are
employed had more than fourteen but fewer than fifty
budgeted vacancies of sworn peace officers.
E. A peace officer may have their bonus application completed
by an employee of the law enforcement agency by which they are
employed. The employing law enforcement agency of the peace officer
shall sponsor the application of qualified officers within their
Req. No. 11398 Page 3

agen cy and verify the completion of the prerequisites within the
application.
F. No law enforcement agency shall reduce or supplant existing
salaries due to the award of grant funding as provided under the
provisions of this section.
G. The Office of the Attorney General is hereby authorized to
adopt rules and procedures as necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 20m-2 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Office of the Attorney General to be designated the
"Oklahoma 10-8 Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing
fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of
all monies directed to the fund and eligible for deposit by law and
a one-time appropriation of Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00)
from the State General Revenue Fund. All monies accruing to the
credit of said fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and
expended by the Office of the Attorney General exclusively for the
purposes and in compliance with the Oklahoma 10-8 Fund Grant
Program, created in Section 1 of this act. Expenditures from said
fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Req. No. 11398 Page 4

Offi ce of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11398 MJ 01/13/25



















Req. No. 11398 Page 5